Illinois, session 104th, HB4541.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act is 5amended by changing Sections 15-102 and 15-1302 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 1026/15-102)7    Sec. 15-102. Definitions. In this Act:8        (1) "Administrator" means the State Treasurer. 9        (2) "Administrator's agent" means a person with which 10    the administrator contracts to conduct an examination 11    under Article 10 on behalf of the administrator. The term 12    includes an independent contractor of the person and each 13    individual participating in the examination on behalf of 14    the person or contractor. 15        (2.5) (Blank).16        (3) "Apparent owner" means a person whose name appears 17    on the records of a holder as the owner of property held, 18    issued, or owing by the holder.19        (3.5) "Asset purchaser" means a business association 20    that has purchased property from a large business 21    association as defined in subsection (j) of Section 22    15-1302 of this Act.23        (4) "Business association" means a corporation, joint   HB4541 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1    stock company, investment company, unincorporated 2    association, joint venture, limited liability company, 3    business trust, trust company, land bank, safe deposit 4    company, safekeeping depository, financial organization, 5    insurance company, federally chartered entity, utility, 6    sole proprietorship, or other business entity, whether or 7    not for profit.8        (5) "Confidential information" means information that 9    is "personal information" under the Personal Information 10    Protection Act, "private information" under the Freedom of 11    Information Act or personal information contained within 12    public records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 13    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 14    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 15    individual subjects of the information as provided in the 16    Freedom of Information Act.17        (6) "Domicile" means:18            (A) for a corporation, the state of its 19        incorporation;20            (B) for a business association whose formation 21        requires a filing with a state, other than a 22        corporation, the state of its filing;23            (C) for a federally chartered entity or an 24        investment company registered under the Investment 25        Company Act of 1940, the state of its home office; and 26            (D) for any other holder, the state of its   HB4541 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1        principal place of business.2        (7) "Electronic" means relating to technology having 3    electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, 4    electromagnetic, or similar capabilities. 5        (8) "Electronic mail" means a communication by 6    electronic means which is automatically retained and 7    stored and may be readily accessed or retrieved. 8        (8.5) "Escheat fee" means any charge imposed solely by 9    virtue of property being reported as presumed abandoned. 10        (9) "Financial organization" means a bank, savings 11    bank, foreign bank, corporate fiduciary, currency 12    exchange, money transmitter, or credit union.13        (9.5) "Finder" means (i) a person engaged in the 14    location, recovery, purchase, or assignment of property 15    held by the administrator for a fee, compensation, 16    commission, or other remuneration paid by the owner of the 17    property or (ii) a person engaged in assisting in the 18    location, recovery, purchase, or assignment of property 19    held by the administrator for a fee, compensation, 20    commission, or other remuneration paid by the owner of the 21    property. 22        (10) "Game-related digital content" means digital 23    content that exists only in an electronic game or 24    electronic-game platform. The term:25            (A) includes: 26                (i) game-play currency such as a virtual   HB4541 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1            wallet, even if denominated in United States 2            currency; and3                (ii) the following if for use or redemption 4            only within the game or platform or another 5            electronic game or electronic-game platform: 6                    (I) points sometimes referred to as gems, 7                tokens, gold, and similar names; and 8                    (II) digital codes; and9            (B) does not include an item that the issuer:10                (i) permits to be redeemed for use outside a 11            game or platform for:12                    (I) money; or 13                    (II) goods or services that have more than 14                minimal value; or15                (ii) otherwise monetizes for use outside a 16            game or platform.17        (11) "Gift card" means a record evidencing a promise 18    made for consideration by the seller or issuer of the 19    record that goods, services, or money will be provided to 20    the owner of the record to the value or amount shown in the 21    record that is either:22            (A) a record:23                (i) issued on a prepaid basis primarily for 24            personal, family, or household purposes to a 25            consumer in a specified amount;26                (ii) the value of which does not expire;  HB4541 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1                (iii) that is not subject to a dormancy, 2            inactivity, or post-sale service fee;3                (iv) that is redeemable upon presentation for 4            goods or services; and 5                (v) that, unless required by law, may not be 6            redeemed for or converted into money or otherwise 7            monetized by the issuer; or8            (B) a prepaid commercial mobile radio service, as 9        defined in 47 CFR 20.3, as amended.10        (12) "Holder" means a person obligated to hold for the 11    account of, or to deliver or pay to, the owner, property 12    subject to this Act.13        (13) "Insurance company" means an association, 14    corporation, or fraternal or mutual-benefit organization, 15    whether or not for profit, engaged in the business of 16    providing life endowments, annuities, or insurance, 17    including accident, burial, casualty, credit-life, 18    contract-performance, dental, disability, fidelity, fire, 19    health, hospitalization, illness, life, malpractice, 20    marine, mortgage, surety, wage-protection, and 21    worker-compensation insurance.22        (14) "Loyalty card" means a record given without 23    direct monetary consideration under an award, reward, 24    benefit, loyalty, incentive, rebate, or promotional 25    program which may be used or redeemed only to obtain goods 26    or services or a discount on goods or services. The term   HB4541 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1    does not include a record that may be redeemed for money or 2    otherwise monetized by the issuer.3        (15) "Mineral" means gas, oil, coal, oil shale, other 4    gaseous liquid or solid hydrocarbon, cement material, sand 5    and gravel, road material, building stone, chemical raw 6    material, gemstone, fissionable and nonfissionable ores, 7    colloidal and other clay, steam and other geothermal 8    resources, and any other substance defined as a mineral by 9    law of this State other than this Act.10        (16) "Mineral proceeds" means an amount payable for 11    extraction, production, or sale of minerals, or, on the 12    abandonment of the amount, an amount that becomes payable 13    after abandonment. The term includes an amount payable: 14            (A) for the acquisition and retention of a mineral 15        lease, including a bonus, royalty, compensatory 16        royalty, shut-in royalty, minimum royalty, and delay 17        rental; 18            (B) for the extraction, production, or sale of 19        minerals, including a net revenue interest, royalty, 20        overriding royalty, extraction payment, and production 21        payment; and 22            (C) under an agreement or option, including a 23        joint-operating agreement, unit agreement, pooling 24        agreement, and farm-out agreement. 25        (17) "Money order" means a payment order for a 26    specified amount of money. The term includes an express   HB4541 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1    money order and a personal money order on which the 2    remitter is the purchaser. 3        (18) "Municipal bond" means a bond or evidence of 4    indebtedness issued by a municipality or other political 5    subdivision of a state.6        (19) "Net card value" means the original purchase 7    price or original issued value of a stored-value card, 8    plus amounts added to the original price or value, minus 9    amounts used and any service charge, fee, or dormancy 10    charge permitted by law.11        (20) "Non-freely transferable security" means a 12    security that cannot be delivered to the administrator by 13    the Depository Trust Clearing Corporation or similar 14    custodian of securities providing post-trade clearing and 15    settlement services to financial markets or cannot be 16    delivered because there is no agent to effect transfer. 17    The term includes a worthless security. 18        (21) "Owner", unless the context otherwise requires, 19    means a person that has a legal, beneficial, or equitable 20    interest in property subject to this Act or the person's 21    legal representative when acting on behalf of the owner. 22    The term includes:23            (A) a depositor, for a deposit; 24            (B) a beneficiary, for a trust other than a 25        deposit in trust; 26            (C) a creditor, claimant, or payee, for other   HB4541 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1        property; and 2            (D) the lawful bearer of a record that may be used 3        to obtain money, a reward, or a thing of value. 4        (22) "Payroll card" means a record that evidences a 5    payroll-card account as defined in Regulation E, 12 CFR 6    Part 1005, as amended.7        (23) "Person" means an individual, estate, business 8    association, public corporation, government or 9    governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or 10    other legal entity, whether or not for profit. 11        (24) "Property" means tangible property described in 12    Section 15-205 or a fixed and certain interest in 13    intangible property held, issued, or owed in the course of 14    a holder's business or by a government, governmental 15    subdivision, agency, or instrumentality. The term: 16            (A) includes all income from or increments to the 17        property;18            (B) includes property referred to as or evidenced 19        by:20                (i) money, virtual currency, interest, or a 21            dividend, check, draft, deposit, or payroll card; 22                (ii) a credit balance, customer's overpayment, 23            stored-value card, security deposit, refund, 24            credit memorandum, unpaid wage, unused ticket for 25            which the issuer has an obligation to provide a 26            refund, mineral proceeds, or unidentified   HB4541 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1            remittance; 2                (iii) a security except for: 3                    (I) a worthless security; or 4                    (II) a security that is subject to a lien, 5                legal hold, or restriction evidenced on the 6                records of the holder or imposed by operation 7                of law, if the lien, legal hold, or 8                restriction restricts the holder's or owner's 9                ability to receive, transfer, sell, or 10                otherwise negotiate the security;11                (iv) a bond, debenture, note, or other 12            evidence of indebtedness; 13                (v) money deposited to redeem a security, make 14            a distribution, or pay a dividend; 15                (vi) an amount due and payable under an 16            annuity contract or insurance policy; 17                (vii) an amount distributable from a trust or 18            custodial fund established under a plan to provide 19            health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, 20            retirement, death, stock purchase, profit-sharing, 21            employee-savings, supplemental-unemployment 22            insurance, or a similar benefit; and 23                (viii) any instrument on which a financial 24            organization or business association is directly 25            liable; and 26            (C) does not include:  HB4541 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1                (i) game-related digital content;2                (ii) a loyalty card;3                (iii) a gift card; or4                (iv) funds on deposit or held in trust 5            pursuant to Section 16 of the Illinois Pre-Need 6            Cemetery Sales Act; and .7            (D) includes any overpayment made by any person to 8        a government, governmental subdivision, agency, or 9        instrumentality, including, but not limited to, a 10        payment for any tax, license, or fee that was made in 11        excess of the amount ultimately required of the payor. 12        The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th 13        General Assembly is a restatement and clarification of 14        existing law. 15        (25) "Putative holder" means a person believed by the 16    administrator to be a holder, until the person pays or 17    delivers to the administrator property subject to this Act 18    or the administrator or a court makes a final 19    determination that the person is or is not a holder. 20        (26) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a 21    tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or 22    other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. The 23    phrase "records of the holder" includes records maintained 24    by a third party that has contracted with the holder.25        (27) "Security" means: 26            (A) a security as defined in Article 8 of the   HB4541 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1        Uniform Commercial Code;2            (B) a security entitlement as defined in Article 8 3        of the Uniform Commercial Code, including a customer 4        security account held by a registered broker-dealer, 5        to the extent the financial assets held in the 6        security account are not:7                (i) registered on the books of the issuer in 8            the name of the person for which the broker-dealer 9            holds the assets; 10                (ii) payable to the order of the person; or 11                (iii) specifically indorsed to the person; or 12            (C) an equity interest in a business association 13        not included in subparagraph (A) or (B).14        (28) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate 15    or adopt a record:16            (A) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or 17            (B) to attach to or logically associate with the 18        record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.19        (29) "State" means a state of the United States, the 20    District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the 21    United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular 22    possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United 23    States.24        (30) "Stored-value card" means a card, code, or other 25    device that is:26            (A) issued on a prepaid basis primarily for   HB4541 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1        personal, family, or household purposes to a consumer 2        in a specified amount, whether or not that amount may 3        be increased or reloaded in exchange for payment; and 4            (B) redeemable upon presentation at multiple 5        unaffiliated merchants for goods or services or usable 6        at automated teller machines; and 7        "Stored-value card" does not include a gift card, 8    payroll card, loyalty card, or game-related digital 9    content.10        (31) "Utility" means a person that owns or operates 11    for public use a plant, equipment, real property, 12    franchise, or license for the following public services:13            (A) transmission of communications or information;14            (B) production, storage, transmission, sale, 15        delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, 16        or gas; or 17            (C) provision of sewage or septic services, or 18        trash, garbage, or recycling disposal.19        (32) "Virtual currency" means any type of digital 20    unit, including cryptocurrency, used as a medium of 21    exchange, unit of account, or a form of digitally stored 22    value, which does not have legal tender status recognized 23    by the United States. The term does not include:24            (A) the software or protocols governing the 25        transfer of the digital representation of value; 26            (B) game-related digital content; or  HB4541 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1            (C) a loyalty card or gift card.2        (33) "Worthless security" means a security whose cost 3    of liquidation and delivery to the administrator would 4    exceed the value of the security on the date a report is 5    due under this Act.6(Source: P.A. 104-116, eff. 1-1-26.) 7    (765 ILCS 1026/15-1302)8    Sec. 15-1302. When agreement to locate property void. 9    (a) Time period. Subject to subsection (b), an agreement 10under Section 15-1301 is void if it is entered into during the 11period beginning on the date the property was presumed 12abandoned under this Act and ending 24 months after the 13payment or delivery of the property to the administrator.14    (b) Prohibition on future assignments. If a provision in 15an agreement described in Section 15-1301 applies to an 16obligation that did not exist or was not owed to the assignor 17at the time of execution of the agreement, the provision is 18void regardless of when the agreement was entered into.19    (c) Limit on fees. An agreement under this Article 13 that 20provides for a fee, compensation, commission, or other 21remuneration in an amount that is more than 10% of the amount 22collected is unenforceable except by the apparent owner. The 23purchase, assignment, or other conveyance of unclaimed 24property to a finder, resulting in a net fee, compensation, 25commission, remuneration, or other profit to the finder in   HB4541 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1excess of 10% of the amount collected is prohibited. 2    (d) Other grounds for being void. An apparent owner or the 3administrator may assert that an agreement described in this 4Article 13 is void on a ground other than it provides for 5payment of compensation in excess of the amount authorized by 6paragraph (c) of this Section.7    (e) License required. On or after January 1, 2026, a 8person attempting or seeking to act as a finder must be 9licensed as a finder by the administrator pursuant to Section 1015-1303 15-1503.11    (f) Attorneys. This Section does not apply to an agreement 12between an owner and an attorney to pursue a claim for recovery 13of specifically identified property held by the administrator 14or to contest the administrator's denial of a claim for 15recovery of the property where the attorney has an 16attorney-client relationship with the owner.17    (g) CPA firms. This Section does not apply to an apparent 18owner's agreement with a CPA firm licensed under the Illinois 19Public Accounting Act, or with an affiliate of such firm, if 20all of the following apply:21        (1) the CPA firm has registered with the administrator 22    and is in good standing with the Illinois Department of 23    Financial and Professional Regulation;24        (2) the apparent owner is not a natural person; and25        (3) the CPA firm, or with an affiliate of such firm, 26    also provides the apparent owner professional services to   HB4541 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1    assist with the apparent owner's compliance with the 2    reporting requirements of this Act. The administrator 3    shall adopt rules to implement and administer the 4    registration of CPA firms and the claims process under 5    this paragraph (g). 6    (h) Enforcement. The administrator may use all the powers 7under Section 15-1002 to determine compliance with this 8Article.9    (i) Bankrupt and dissolved business associations. Article 1013 does not apply to asset purchase agreements involving the 11assets of a business association arising out of a bankruptcy 12proceeding under Title 11 of the United States Code or 13corporate dissolution or similar proceeding under applicable 14State law such as receiverships and assignments for the 15benefit of creditors. Claimants for property acquired under 16the provisions of this subsection are not required to be 17licensed as finders.18    (j) Asset purchasers. Article 13 does not apply to asset 19purchase agreements between an asset purchaser and sellers who 20comprise a large business association. For the purposes of 21this subsection, a large business association is a business 22association or group of business associations that:23        (1) generates $100 million or more in annual gross 24    receipts or sales;25        (2) employs 100 or more full-time employees in the 26    United States; or  HB4541 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1        (3) has equity securities publicly traded on an 2    exchange regulated by the federal Securities and Exchange 3    Commission.4    Annual gross receipts or sales shall be determined at the 5level of the unitary business group as that term is defined in 6the Illinois Income Tax Act. The administrator may change by 7administrative rule the annual gross receipts or sales 8threshold to an amount less than $100 million.9    Claims filed by an asset purchaser under this subsection 10must include:11        (1) a complete and unredacted copy of the asset 12    purchase agreement or similar contract between the asset 13    purchaser and the seller; and14        (2) an attestation by the seller in the asset purchase 15    agreement or in a separate written affirmation from the 16    owner that the owner meets one or more of the above 17    characteristics that qualify it as a large business 18    association and is aware that it is selling unclaimed 19    property that may be recovered from the administrator 20    without paying a fee.21    If the seller is a publicly traded entity, the asset 22purchaser may provide a copy, or a link to an online copy, of 23the most recently filed 10K with the Securities and Exchange 24Commission in lieu of the affirmation that the owner meets one 25or more of the characteristics that qualify as a large 26business association.  HB4541 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1    Asset purchase agreements that include future interests in 2property held by the administrator must provide sellers with a 3right to receive notice of amounts received by the asset 4purchaser on claims for that property. Asset purchase 5agreements that include future interests in property held by 6the administrator may provide for a share, purchase price 7adjustment, or deferred payment to the seller upon receipt of 8amounts on claims for that property.9    The asset purchase agreement and the written affirmation 10provided under this subsection are exempt from disclosure 11under the Freedom of Information Act.12    Nothing in this subsection limits the ability of the 13administrator to request or receive additional evidence 14sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the 15administrator that the claimant is the owner of the property 16under Article 9.17    Asset purchasers must register with the administrator. The 18administrator must adopt rules to implement and administer the 19registration of asset purchasers and the claims process under 20this subsection.21    This subsection applies retroactively to any claim filed 22by an asset purchaser between January 1, 2026 and the 23effective date of this Act. Claims filed by an asset purchaser 24after January 1, 2026 based on an asset purchase agreement 25executed before January 1, 2026 must be accompanied by a 26complete and unredacted copy of the asset purchase agreement   HB4541 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17848 JRC 31282 b1or similar contract between the asset purchaser and the seller 2but otherwise comply with Article 13 as it existed before 3January 1, 2026.4(Source: P.A. 103-977, eff. 1-1-25; 104-116, eff. 1-1-26.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.